Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202060-126
Parts vehicle, defined.

Parts vehicle means a vehicle the title to which has been surrendered
(1) in accordance with subdivision (1)(a) of section 60-169 or (2) to any
other state by the owner of the vehicle or an insurance company to render
the vehicle fit for sale for scrap and parts only.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 26;

Laws 2011, LB241, § 1.